Utah statutes.
16-16-505.   Right of member and former member to information.
(1)  Not later than ten business days after receipt of a demand made in a
record, a limited cooperative association shall permit a member to obtain,
inspect, and copy in the association's principal office required information
listed in Subsections 16-16-114(1)(a) through (h) during regular business
hours.  A member need not have any particular purpose for seeking the
information.  The association is not required to provide the same information
listed in Subsections 16-16-114(1)(b) through (h) to the same member more than
once during a six-month period.
(2)  On demand made in a record received by the limited cooperative
association, a member may obtain, inspect, and copy in the association's
principal office required information listed in Subsections 16-16-114(1)(i),
(j), (l), (m), (p), and (r) during regular business hours, if:
(a)  the member seeks the information in good faith and for a proper purpose
reasonably related to the member's interest;
(b)  the demand includes a description with reasonable particularity of the
information sought and the purpose for seeking the information;
(c)  the information sought is directly connected to the member's purpose; and
(d)  the demand is reasonable.
(3)  Not later than ten business days after receipt of a demand pursuant to
Subsection (2), a limited cooperative association shall provide, in a record,
the following information to the member that made the demand:
(a)  if the association agrees to provide the demanded information:
(i)  what information the association will provide in response to the demand;
and
(ii)  a reasonable time and place at which the association will provide the
information; or
(b)  if the association declines to provide some or all of the demanded
information, the association's reasons for declining.
(4)  A person dissociated as a member may obtain, inspect, and copy
information available to a member under Subsection (1) or (2) by delivering a
demand in a record to the limited cooperative association in the same manner
and subject to the same conditions applicable to a member under Subsection (2)
if:
(a)  the information pertains to the period during which the person was a
member in the association; and
(b)  the person seeks the information in good faith.
(5)  A limited cooperative association shall respond to a demand made pursuant
to Subsection (4) in the manner provided in Subsection (3).
(6)  Not later than ten business days after receipt by a limited cooperative
association of a demand made by a member in a record, but not more often than
once in a six-month period, the association shall deliver to the member a
record stating the information with respect to the member required by
Subsection 16-16-114(1)(q).
(7)  A limited cooperative association may impose reasonable restrictions,
including nondisclosure restrictions, on the use of information obtained under
this section.  In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction
under this Subsection (7), the association has the burden of proving
reasonableness.
(8)  A limited cooperative association may charge a person that makes a demand
under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor
and material.
(9)  A person that may obtain information under this section may obtain the
information through an attorney or other agent.  A restriction imposed on the
person under Subsection (7) or by the organic rules applies to the attorney or
other agent.
(10)  The rights stated in this section do not extend to a person as
transferee.
(11)  The organic rules may require a limited cooperative association to
provide more information than required by this section and may establish
conditions and procedures for providing the information.
